Maryland, session 2026, HB0672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Maryland Pediatric Cancer Fund established under
this section.
(3) “Pediatric cancer research” includes research to develop and advance
the understanding of pediatric cancer and the techniques and modalities effective in the
prevention, cure, screening, and treatment of pediatric cancer.
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Pediatric Cancer Fund.
(2) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(ii) Any donations or other money from any other source accepted for
the benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Fund shall be used only for pediatric cancer research and
administrative expenses as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 220 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) The Fund shall be maintained for the purposes stated in this section
and unspent portions of the Fund shall remain in the Fund and may not revert to the
General Fund of the State.
(6) Money expended from the Fund for pediatric cancer research is
supplemental and is not intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be
appropriated to the Department for pediatric cancer research.
(7) All expenditures from the Fund shall be made only in accordance with
an appropriation approved by the General Assembly in the annual State budget or through
an approved budget amendment under §§ 7–209 and 7–210 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(8) (i) For fiscal year 2023, the Governor shall include in the annual
budget bill an appropriation of $5,000,000 to the Fund.
(ii) If $5,000,000 is not included in the annual budget bill for fiscal
year 2023, then the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill for fiscal year 2024 an
appropriation of $5,000,000 to the Fund.
(c) (1) (i) Each year, the Secretary may:
1. Distribute funds from the Fund to a promotional account
to be allocated to a State–based childhood cancer organization to be used to promote further
donations to the Fund and to educate the State scientific community about the
opportunities for childhood cancer research through the Fund; and
2. Use funds from the Fund to administer the Fund,
including for staff and administrative costs associated with the Commission established
under § 20–121 of this title.
(ii) The amounts distributed and used under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may not exceed a total of 5% of the Fund.
(2) (i) After making the distribution allowed under paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Secretary shall use the remainder of the Fund only to provide grants
to [eligible physicians,] NONPROFIT hospitals, [laboratories,] educational institutions,
and other NONPROFIT organizations [and persons] to conduct pediatric cancer research.
(ii) Money received from the grant program under this section may
not be used to pay for institutional overhead expenses, organizational expenses, or charges
that are not directly related to pediatric cancer research or expenses arising from
community–based support services.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 220
(d) (1) On or before August 31 each year, the Secretary shall submit a report
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
the administration of the Fund.
(2) The report required under this subsection shall include:
(i) A description of promotional efforts undertaken with money from
the Fund; and
(ii) A detailed accounting of the use of the Fund.
(e) The Secretary shall adopt regulations to implement a pediatric cancer grant
program under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –